Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2758YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 561 Section 1. Section 709.8A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 709.8A Grooming. 3 1. A person commits grooming when the person knowingly 4 performs an act in person or by conduct through a third party, 5 uses a computer, internet service, or any other electronic 6 storage or transmission device, or uses written communication 7 to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice, or attempt to seduce, 8 solicit, lure, or entice, a child or a person believed to be a 9 child , including a law enforcement officer or agent posing as a 10 child, to commit any unlawful sex act or to otherwise engage in 11 unlawful sexual conduct. As used in this section , âchildâ means 12 a person under eighteen years of age. 13 2. Grooming is a class âDâ felony. 14